Utah statutes.
58-5a-501.   Unlawful conduct -- Penalties.

Any person who engages in unlawful conduct as defined in this chapter is guilty of a third degree felony, except that a violation of Subsection 58-5a-102(3)(a) is a class A misdemeanor.

